Washington statutes.
RCW 35.22.050

Election of freeholders to frame charter.

Whenever the population of a city is ten thousand or more, the legislative authority thereof shall provide by ordinance for an election to be held therein for the purpose of electing fifteen freeholders for the purpose of framing a charter for the city. The members of the board of freeholders must be qualified electors and must have been residents of the city for a period of at least two years prior to their election.

[ 1965 ex.s. c 47 s 7; 1965 c 7 s 35.22.050. Prior: 1890 p 216 s 3, part; RRS s 8953, part.]